Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.160

ESD board—Reimbursement of members for expenses.

The actual expenses of educational service board members in going to, returning from and attending meetings called or held pursuant to district business or while otherwise engaged in the performance of their duties under this chapter shall be paid; all such claims shall be approved by the educational service district board and paid from the budget of the educational service district.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 68; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.21.060, 28.19.525.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.